Ohio, session 136, HB995.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 125.848 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 125.848. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Electric vehicle" means a vehicle that is powered in part or wholly by a system that can be recharged via an external source of electricity, including a vehicle for public or private use that is a passenger car, commercial car or truck, a vehicle used for public transit, a vehicle used in a vehicle fleet, a vehicle used in construction work, and a vehicle used in industrial or warehouse work. (2) "Electric vehicle charging station" means behind the meter electric equipment by which electric current is transferred to the power system of an electric vehicle. (3) "Public use of an electric vehicle charging station" means use of an electric vehicle charging station by a person, entity, or state agency that is not the owner or the assigned user of both the electric vehicle charging station and the electric vehicle being charged at that electric vehicle charging station. (4) "State agency" means every organized body, office, or agency established by the laws of this state for the exercise of any function of state government, including any state-supported institution of higher education, the courts, or any judicial agency. "State agency" also includes the general assembly, any legislative agency, and the capitol square review and advisory board. (B) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and except as provided in division (E) of this section, no state agency shall offer public use of an electric vehicle charging station on property that is under the control of that state agency unless the state agency requires a reasonable fee to be paid in an amount set by the director of administrative services under division (C) of this section. (C) The director shall establish a reasonable fee, and may change the fee as necessary, for each electric vehicle charging station on property that is under the control of a state agency in this state and that is intended for public use by taking into account all of the following: (1) The cost of the electric current transferred to the power system of the electric vehicle; (2) The cost of purchasing and installing the electric vehicle charging station; (3) Any costs associated with maintaining the electric vehicle charging station. (D) A state agency shall charge the fee set by the director in accordance with division (C) of this section. (E) A state agency may provide an electric vehicle charging station on property that is under the control of that state agency to charge an electric vehicle that is used exclusively by that state agency without requiring a fee.